Missouri, session 2026, HB2476.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 160.265, RSMo, and section 163.021 as enacted by senate bill no.
727, one hundred second general assembly, second regular session, are repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 160.265 and 163.021, to read as
follows:
160.265. 1. A student who is subject to a suspension or expulsion as provided under
this chapter or chapter 167 shall be counted as being in attendance for up to one hundred
eighty days for the following purposes:
(1) Calculating the attendance rate under the Missouri school improvement plan or
any other similar school accountability system utilized by the department that utilizes student
attendance as a metric of school performance; and
(2) Calculating a local education agency's weighted average daily attendance under
section 163.031.
2. A suspension or expulsion issued to a student shall not remove the
responsibility to educate the student as required by state law.
163.021. 1. A school district shall receive state aid for its education program only if
it:
(1) Provides for at least a minimum school term as provided in section 171.031[.
When the aggregate hours lost in a term due to inclement weather decreases the total hours of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2476 2
the school term below the required minimum number of hours by more than twelve hours for
all-day students or six hours for one-half-day kindergarten students, all such hours below the
minimum must be made up as provided in section 171.033];
(2) Maintains adequate and accurate records of attendance, personnel and finances, as
required by the state board of education, which shall include the preparation of a financial
statement which shall be submitted to the state board of education the same as required by the
provisions of section 165.111 for districts;
(3) Levies an operating levy for school purposes of not less than one dollar and
twenty-five cents after all adjustments and reductions on each one hundred dollars assessed
valuation of the district; and
(4) Computes average daily attendance as defined in subdivision (2) of section
163.011 as modified by section 171.031. Whenever there has existed within the district an
infectious disease, contagion, epidemic, plague or similar condition whereby the school
attendance is substantially reduced for an extended period in any school year, the
apportionment of school funds and all other distribution of school moneys shall be made
on the basis of the school year next preceding the year in which such condition existed.
2. For the 2006-07 school year and thereafter, no school district shall receive more
state aid, as calculated under subsections 1 and 2 of section 163.031, for its education
program, exclusive of categorical add-ons, than it received per weighted average daily
attendance for the school year 2005-06 from the foundation formula, line 14, gifted, remedial
reading, exceptional pupil aid, fair share, and free textbook payment amounts, unless it has an
operating levy for school purposes, as determined pursuant to section 163.011, of not less
than two dollars and seventy-five cents after all adjustments and reductions. Any district
which is required, pursuant to Article X, Section 22 of the Missouri Constitution, to reduce its
operating levy below the minimum tax rate otherwise required under this subsection shall not
be construed to be in violation of this subsection for making such tax rate reduction. Pursuant
to Section 10(c) of Article X of the state constitution, a school district may levy the operating
levy for school purposes required by this subsection less all adjustments required pursuant to
Article X, Section 22 of the Missouri Constitution if such rate does not exceed the highest tax
rate in effect subsequent to the 1980 tax year. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
mean that a school district is guaranteed to receive an amount not less than the amount the
school district received per eligible pupil for the school year 1990-91. The provisions of this
subsection shall not apply to any school district located in a county of the second
classification which has a nuclear power plant located in such district or to any school district
located in a county of the third classification which has an electric power generation unit with
a rated generating capacity of more than one hundred fifty megawatts which is owned or
operated or both by a rural electric cooperative except that such school districts may levy for

HB 2476 3
current school purposes and capital projects an operating levy not to exceed two dollars and
seventy-five cents less all adjustments required pursuant to Article X, Section 22 of the
Missouri Constitution.
3. No school district shall receive more state aid, as calculated in section 163.031, for
its education program, exclusive of categorical add-ons, than it received per eligible pupil for
the school year 1993-94, if the state board of education determines that the district was not in
compliance in the preceding school year with the requirements of section 163.172, until such
time as the board determines that the district is again in compliance with the requirements of
section 163.172.
4. No school district shall receive state aid, pursuant to section 163.031, if such
district was not in compliance, during the preceding school year, with the requirement,
established pursuant to section 160.530 to allocate revenue to the professional development
committee of the district.
5. No school district shall receive more state aid, as calculated in subsections 1 and 2
of section 163.031, for its education program, exclusive of categorical add-ons, than it
received per weighted average daily attendance for the school year 2005-06 from the
foundation formula, line 14, gifted, remedial reading, exceptional pupil aid, fair share, and
free textbook payment amounts, if the district did not comply in the preceding school year
with the requirements of subsection 5 of section 163.031.
6. Any school district that levies an operating levy for school purposes that is less
than the performance levy, as such term is defined in section 163.011, shall provide written
notice to the department of elementary and secondary education asserting that the district is
providing an adequate education to the students of such district. If a school district asserts
that it is not providing an adequate education to its students, such inadequacy shall be deemed
to be a result of insufficient local effort. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to
any special district established under sections 162.815 to 162.940.
✔